Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-713
Credits for payments.

A tribunal of this state shall credit amounts collected for a particular period pursuant to any child support order against the amounts owed for the same period under any other child support order for support of the same child issued by a tribunal of this state, another state, or a foreign country.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 13;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 52;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 12.